Hawaii statutes.
§386-153 Levy on insurers of employers
insured under section 386-121(a)(1). (a) For the calendar year 1974 and
for each calendar year thereafter, insurers of employers, as defined in section
386-1, shall pay a levy determined by the director which shall be based on a
percentage on gross premiums, as defined in section 431:7-202(a), derived from
workers' compensation insurance issued during the prior year in accordance with
chapter 386 and chapter 431, if the levying and collecting of such a levy is required
pursuant to section 386-152, which levy shall be collected in the same manner
as the tax provided for in section 431:7-202 is collected and shall be
deposited in the special compensation fund established in section 386-151.
This levy shall be in addition to any tax imposed in chapter 431 on gross
premiums derived from workers' compensation insurance.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), from its
inception through December 31, 2007, the Hawaii Employers' Mutual Insurance
Company, Inc., shall be exempt from this levy; provided that this exemption
shall apply to the first $25,000,000 of written premiums in each calendar year;
and provided further that annual written premiums in excess of $25,000,000
shall be subject to this levy at the same rate as other insurers. Any moneys
heretofore paid by Hawaii Employers' Mutual Insurance Company, Inc., to the
special compensation fund shall be retained by the special compensation fund to
be credited to future levy balances owed by Hawaii Employers' Mutual Insurance
Company, Inc. [L 1963, c 103, pt of §1; Supp, §97-142; HRS §386-153; am L 1973,
c 183, §3; am L 1975, c 41, §1; am L 1991, c 165, §1; am L 1999, c 163, §22]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next